Louisiana, session 2026, SB270.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1046.5 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1046.5. Access to medical marijuana in a healthcare facility
A. As used in this Section the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Healthcare facility" means a healthcare facility licensed pursuant
to R.S. 40:2006(A)(2). Healthcare facility shall not mean any freestanding or
distinct part unit of a hospital providing behavioral health services or any
emergency or outpatient department of a hospital.
(2) "Medical marijuana" means marijuana for therapeutic use produced
and recommended to a patient in accordance with R.S. 40:1046.
(3) "Patient" means a person who has a terminal and irreversible
condition as defined by R.S. 40:1151.1 and maintains a current recommendation
to use medical marijuana.
B. A healthcare facility shall permit patient use of medical marijuana
and shall:
(1) Prohibit smoking or vaping as methods to use medical marijuana.
(2) Include the use of medical marijuana within the patient's medical
records.
(3) Require a patient to provide a copy of the patient's recommendation
for medical marijuana pursuant to R.S. 40:1046.
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 270 ENROLLED
(4) Require a patient or a primary caregiver to be responsible for
acquiring, retrieving, administering, and removing medical marijuana.
(5) Subject to the policy adopted by the healthcare facility, require
medical marijuana to be stored securely at all times in a locked container
provided by the patient in the patient's room, other designated area, or with the
patient's primary caregiver.
(6) Prohibit health care professionals, healthcare facility staff, including
but not limited to physicians, nurses, and pharmacists, from administering,
storing, retrieving, or assisting the patient with the medical marijuana.
(7) Upon discharge, all remaining medical marijuana shall be removed
by the patient or patient's primary caregiver. If a patient cannot remove the
medical marijuana and does not have a primary caregiver that is available to
remove the medical marijuana, the medical marijuana shall be disposed of in
accordance with the health facility policy and procedure governing medical
marijuana.
(8) Develop, disseminate, and train health facility staff on the written
guidelines developed by the facility for patient use of medical marijuana within
the health care facility pursuant to this Section.
C. The provisions of this Section shall not require a healthcare facility
to provide a terminally ill patient with a recommendation to use medical
marijuana or include medical marijuana in a patient's discharge plan.
D. Compliance with this Section shall not be a condition for obtaining,
retaining, or renewing a license as a healthcare facility.
E. If a federal regulatory agency, the United States Department of
Justice, or the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services takes one of the
following actions against a healthcare facility, then all healthcare facilities may
suspend compliance with the provisions of this Section until the federal
regulatory agency, the United States Department of Justice, or the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services notifies the healthcare facility that it may
resume allowing the use of medical marijuana within the facility:
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 270 ENROLLED
(1) A federal regulatory agency or the United States Department of
Justice initiates enforcement action against a healthcare facility related to the
facility's compliance with a state-regulated medical marijuana program.
(2) A federal regulatory agency, the United States Department of Justice,
or the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services issues a rule or otherwise
provides notification to the healthcare facility that expressly prohibits the use
of medical marijuana in healthcare facilities or otherwise prohibits compliance
with a state-regulated medical marijuana program.
F. A healthcare facility shall not prohibit a terminally ill patient's use of
medical marijuana due solely to the fact that marijuana is a Schedule I drug
pursuant to the federal Uniform Controlled Substances Act or other federal
constraints on the use of medical marijuana that were in existence prior to the
enactment of this Section.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.